Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 5
FINANCE

7-80-501. Form of contribution.

The contribution of a member may be in cash, property, or services rendered or a promissory note or other obligation to contribute cash or property or to perform services. A person may be admitted to a limited liability company as a member of the limited liability company and may receive a membership interest in the limited liability company without making a contribution or being obligated to make a contribution to the limited liability company. Unless otherwise provided in the operating agreement, a person may be admitted to a limited liability company as a member of the limited liability company without acquiring a membership interest in the limited liability company. Unless otherwise provided in the operating agreement, a person may be admitted as the sole member of a limited liability company without making a contribution or being obligated to make a contribution to the limited liability company or without acquiring a membership interest in the limited liability company.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 431, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 942, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 1203, § 3, effective October 1.

7-80-502. Liability for contributions.

A member is obligated to the limited liability company to perform any enforceable promise to contribute cash or property or to perform services, even if the member is unable to perform because of death, disability, or any other reason. If a member does not make the required contribution of property or services, the member is obligated at the option of the limited liability company to contribute cash equal to that portion of the value, as stated in the limited liability records required to be kept by section 7-80-408, of such contribution that has not been made.

The obligation of a member to make a contribution or return money or other property paid or distributed in violation of this article may be compromised only by consent in writing of all the members. Notwithstanding the compromise, a creditor of a limited liability company who extends credit or otherwise acts in reliance on the original obligation may enforce the original obligation.

No promise by a member to contribute to the limited liability company is enforceable unless set out in a writing signed by the member.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 431, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 94:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 716, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 942, § 8, effective July 1.

7-80-503. Sharing of profits and losses.

The profits and losses of a limited liability company shall be allocated among the members and among classes of members on the basis of the value, as stated in the limited liability company records required to be kept pursuant to section 7-80-408, of the contributions made by each member.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 431, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 717, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 942, § 9, effective July 1.

7-80-504. Sharing of distributions.

Distributions of cash or other assets of a limited liability company shall be allocated among the members and among classes of members on the basis of the value, as stated in the limited liability company records required to be kept pursuant to section 7-80-408, of the contributions made by each member.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 431, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 717, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 942, § 10, effective July 1.